en: Sweet verrines
da: Desserter i glas
fr: Verrines sucrées
sv: Söta verriner

en: Bars
bg: Барчета
ca: Barretes
de: Riegel
es: Barritas
fi: patukat
fr: Barres, Barre
he: חטיפי פס
hr: Barovi
hu: Szeletek
it: Barrette
lt: Batonėliai
nl: Repen
pl: Batoniki
pt: Barras
ro: Batoane
ru: Батончики
zh: 棒状零食

en: Protein bars
bg: Протеинови блокчета
ca: Barretes de proteïna, barres de proteïna
cs: Proteinové tyčinky
de: Proteinriegel, Eiweißriegel
es: Barritas de proteínas
fi: proteiinipatukat
fr: Barres protéinées
he: חטיפי חלבון
hr: Proteinske pločice
it: Barrette proteiche
ja: プロテインバー
nl: Proteinerepen
pt: Barras de proteínas
ro: Batoane proteice
ru: Протеиновые батончики
zh: 蛋白质棒

en: Protein Energy Bars
de: Protein-Energie-Riegel
fr: Barres énergétiques protéinées
hr: Proteinske energetske pločice
it: Barrette Energetiche Proteiche
nl: Proteïne energierepen
zh: 蛋白质能量棒

en: Energy bars
bg: Енергийни блокчета
cs: Energetické tyčinky
de: Energieriegel, Energie-Riegel
es: Barritas energéticas
fi: energiapatukat
fr: Barres énergétiques
he: חטיפים אנרגיה
hr: Energetske pločice
it: Barrette energetiche
nl: Energierepen
pl: Batony energetyczne
zh: 能量棒

en: Curd snacks
lt: Varškės sūreliai

en: Cereal bars, Granola bars, Chewy Granola Bars, muesli bars
ca: Barres de cereals, Barres de granola, Barres de musli
de: Getreideriegel, Müsliriegel
es: Barritas de cereales
fi: jyväpatukat
fr: Barres de céréales, Barre de céréales, Barres céréalières, Barres aux céréales, barres granola
hr: Žitne pločice
hu: Müzliszelet
it: Barrette di cereali
ja: シリアルバー, グラノーラバー
nl: Graanrepen, Mueslirepen
pl: Batony zbożowe, Batoniki zbożowe
pt: Barras de cereais
ru: Мюсли-батончики

en: Extruded cereal bars
fr: Barres de céréales extrudées

en: Fruits cereal bars, Cereal bar with fruit, Cereal bar with fruits
de: Müsliriegel mit Fruchtstückchen
es: Barritas de cereales y fruta
fr: Barres de céréales aux fruits, Barre de céréales aux fruits, Barre céréalière aux fruits, Barres céréalières aux fruits
hr: Voćne žitne pločice
it: Barrette di cereali con frutti
nl: Ontbijtrepen met fruit
ro: Batoane de cereale cu fructe

en: Cereal bar with fruits fortified with vitamins and minerals
fr: Barre céréalière équilibre aux fruits enrichie en vitamines et minéraux

en: Apricot cereal bars
fr: Barres de céréales à l'abricot, Barre de céréales à l'abricot
hr: Žitne pločice od kajsije
it: Barrette di cereali con albicocca
nl: Graanrepen met abrikozen

en: Strawberry cereal bars
bg: Мюсли бар с ягода
fr: Barres de céréales aux fraises, Barre de céréales aux fraises
hr: Žitne pločice s jagodama
ro: Batoane de cereale cu căpșuni

en: Banana cereal bars
bg: Мюсли бар с банан
de: Müsliriegel mit Bananenstückchen
fr: Barres de céréales à la banane, Barre de céréales à la banane
hr: Banana žitne pločice
it: Barrette di cereali con banana
nl: Graanrepen met banaan
ro: Batoane de cereale cu banane

en: Apple cereal bars
bg: Мюсли бар с ябълка
de: Apfel Müsliriegel
fr: Barres de céréales à la pomme, Barre de céréales à la pomme
hr: Jabučne žitne pločice
it: Barrette di cereali con mela
nl: Graanrepen met appel
ro: Batoane de cereale cu mere
zh: 苹果谷物棒

en: Chocolate cereal bars
bg: Мюсли бар с шоколад
de: Müsliriegel mit Schokolade
es: Barritas de cereales con chocolate
fi: Suklaiset viljapatukat
fr: Barres de céréales au chocolat, Barre de céréales au chocolat
hr: Čokoladne žitne pločice
it: Barrette di cereali con cioccolato
nl: Chocolade graanrepen
pt: Barras de cereais com chocolate
ro: Batoane de cereale cu ciocolată

en: Cereal bar with chocolate fortified with vitamins and minerals
fr: barre de céréales au chocolat renforcée en vitamines et minéraux

en: Cereal bars with nuts, Nuts cereal bars
de: Nussmüsliriegel
fr: Barres de céréales aux fruits à coques
hr: Orasi žitne pločice
it: Barrette di cereali di noci
nl: Graanrepen met noten
ro: Batoane de cereale cu nuci

en: Cereal bars with almonds, cereal bar with almonds
es: Barrita de cereales con almendras
fr: Barre céréalière aux amandes, Barre de céréales aux amandes
hr: Žitna pločica s bademima
it: Barrette di cereali con mandorle
pt: Barras de cereais com amêndoas

en: Cereal bars with hazelnuts, cereal bar with hazelnuts
es: Barrita de cereales con avellanas
fr: Barre céréalière aux noisettes, Barre de céréales aux noisettes
hr: Žitna pločica s lješnjacima
it: Barrette di cereali con nocciole
pt: Barras de cereais com avelãs

en: Low calorie cereal bar
fr: Barre céréalière diététique hypocalorique